Utah statutes.
19-6-1203.   Reporting requirements.

(1)  On or after July 1, 2011, a manufacturer may not offer a consumer electronic device for sale in the state unless the manufacturer, either individually, through a group manufacturer organization, or through the manufacturer's industry trade group, prepares and submits, subject to Subsection (2), a report on or before August 1 of each year to the department.

(2)  The report required under Subsection (1):

(a)  shall include a list of eligible programs, subject to Subsection (3); and

(b)  may include:

(i)  an existing collection, transportation, or recycling system for a consumer electronic device; and

(ii)  an eligible program offered by:

(A)  a consumer electronic device recycler;

(B)  a consumer electronic device repair shop;

(C)  a recycler of other commodities;

(D)  a reuse organization;

(E)  a not-for-profit corporation;

(F)  a retailer; or

(G)  another similar operation, including a local government collection event.

(3)  The list required in Subsection (2)(a) may be in the form of a geographic map identifying the type and location of an eligible program.

(4)  The department shall:

(a)  compile the report required under Subsection (1); and

(b)  beginning on October 31, 2012, submit annually on or before October 31 the compiled report to the Natural Resources, Agriculture, and Environment Interim Committee and the Public Utilities and Technology Interim Committee.



Enacted by Chapter 213, 2011 General Session

